Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-371
Vulnerable adult, defined.

Vulnerable adult means any person eighteen years of age or older who has a substantial mental or functional impairment or for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed under the Nebraska Probate Code.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 24;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 7.

Nebraska Probate Code, see section 30-2201.